Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 3. Termination of Parental Rights

Cross references. —

For Child Custody Act, see chapter 5 of title 20.

As to appointment of guardians ad litem, see Rule 17(c), W.R.C.P.

Right to associate with one's family is fundamental liberty.

DS v. Department of Pub. Assistance & Social Servs., 607 P.2d 911,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 245

(Wyo. 1980).

But state may regulate and terminate parental rights

in proper cases and upon valid grounds. In re M., 556 P.2d 514,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1976); DS v. Department of Pub. Assistance & Social Servs., 607 P.2d 911,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 245

(Wyo. 1980).

Ad hoc evaluation of parental rights terminations. —

No two cases as to termination of parental rights are alike, and each must be decided on the basis of its own individual facts. In re M., 556 P.2d 514,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1976).

Strict construction and non-consenting parents. —

Article is strictly construed when proceeding is against nonconsenting parent and every reasonable intendment is made in favor of that parent's claims. DS v. Department of Pub. Assistance & Social Servs., 607 P.2d 911,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 245

(Wyo. 1980).

Termination proceeding requires service of process. —

The termination of parental rights under §§

14-2-308

through

14-2-319

is an independent legal proceeding for which jurisdiction over the parents is independently required. Previous court proceedings involving an interim juvenile custody determination would not vest jurisdiction in the district court to take action under this article independent of compliance with the criteria for service on non-residents and application of the specific provisions of Rule 4, W.R.C.P. In In Interest of DG, 825 P.2d 369,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1992).

Summary judgment not precluded. —

A termination of parental rights cannot generally be accomplished by summary judgment after a motion hearing. However, summary judgment is not necessarily precluded in every termination-of-parental-rights case, and the fundamental fairness and propriety of a particular procedure invoked in a termination proceeding may be reviewed on a case-by-case basis. In re Adoption of JLP, 774 P.2d 624,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 1989).

Duty of reviewing court. —

The rule to apply under this article is that a reviewing court is not in a position to interpret and evaluate evidence but instead is obligated to determine whether or not such evidence presented is a substantial basis for the trial court's holding. In re M., 556 P.2d 514,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1976).

Applied

in

In re Adoption of GSD, 716 P.2d 984,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 521

(Wyo. 1986).

Law reviews. —

For note on medical aid for children without parental consent, see 8 Wyo. L.J. 88 (1958).

For note in termination of parental rights, see 8 Wyo. L.J. 185 (1959).

For comment, “The Wyoming Juvenile Court Act of 1971,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 237 (1973).

For article, “Child Protection: A Suggested Role for Members of the Wyoming State Bar,” see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1974).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d Habeas Corpus § 82; 59 Am. Jur. 2d Parent and Child §§ 16, 29 to 31, 36 to 50.

Physical abuse of child by parent as ground for termination of parent's right to child, 53 ALR3d 605.

Sexual abuse of child by parent as ground for termination of parent's right to child, 58 ALR3d 1074.

Right, in child custody proceedings, to cross-examine investigating officer whose report is used by court in its decision, 59 ALR3d 1337.

Parent's involuntary confinement, or failure to care for child as result thereof, as evincing neglect, unfitness, or the like in dependency or divestiture proceeding, 79 ALR3d 417.

Right of indigent parent to appointed counsel in proceeding for involuntary termination of parental rights, 80 ALR3d 1141.

Admissibility of social worker's expert testimony on child custody issues, 1 ALR4th 837.

Initial award or denial of child custody to homosexual or lesbian parent, 6 ALR4th 1297.

Validity of state statute providing for termination of parental rights, 22 ALR4th 774.

Admissibility at criminal prosecution of expert testimony on battering parent syndrome, 43 ALR4th 1203.

Parent's transsexuality as factor in award of custody of children, visitation rights or termination of parental rights, 59 ALR4th 1170.

Parent's mental deficiency as factor in termination of parental rights — modern status, 1 ALR5th 469.

67A C.J.S. Parent and Child § 4.

§§ 14-2-301 through 14-2-307.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 102, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1955, ch. 169, §§ 1 through 6, related to termination of parental rights. For present similar provisions, see §§

14-2-308

through

14-2-319

.

§ 14-2-308.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Abuse” means as defined by W.S. 14-3-202(a)(ii);

“Authorized agency” means:

A public social service agency authorized to care for and place children; or

A private child welfare agency certified by the state for such purposes pursuant to W.S.

14-6-201

through

14-6-243

,

14-4-101

through

14-4-116

,

1-22-101

through

1-22-114

;

“Child” or “minor” means an individual who is under the age of majority;

“Court” means the district court in the district where the child resides or is found or the district court which has previously retained jurisdiction of the child because of a previous order entered by that court;

“Mental health professional” means a person with an advanced degree in one of the behavioral sciences including a psychologist, social worker or clinical counselor;

“Neglect” means as defined by W.S. 14-3-202(a)(vii);

“Parent” means a natural parent or a parent by adoption;

“Indigent party” means a person whose financial resources and income are insufficient to enable him to pay the reasonable fees and expenses of an attorney licensed to practice in this state;

“This act” means W.S.

14-2-308

through

14-2-319

.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 102, § 1; 1985, ch. 86, § 2; 2000, ch. 48, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Clear and convincing evidence. —

Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure do apply to proceedings for termination of parental rights, and an entry of default can be entered by the clerk against the delinquent parent; however, a default judgment that terminates the rights of the parent cannot be entered by the district court without (1) holding the required hearing; and (2) Wyoming's Department of Family Services presenting clear and convincing evidence of the grounds to terminate the parental rights, all in accordance with the termination of parental rights statutes. If the court finds that a statutory basis for termination has been established by clear and convincing evidence, it can then terminate the parent-child legal relationship. In re HLL, 2016 WY 43, 372 P.3d 185,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 2016).

DFS is “authorized agency”. —

Department of Family Services (DFS), a public social service agency, Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 9-2-2101(a), with authority to oversee the custody and care of children in cases of abuse and neglect under the Child Protection Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

14-3-401

through

14-3-441

, was an “authorized agency” under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

14-2-308

and

14-2-310

with authority to file a petition to terminate a mother's parental rights, even though DFS did not have custody of the children. State v. DH (In the Interest of LB), 2014 WY 10, 316 P.3d 1184,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 2014).

Applied

in

LM v. Laramie County Dep't of Family Servs., 2007 WY 189, 171 P.3d 1077,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 201

(Dec. 5, 2007).

Stated

in

Michael v. Hertzler, 900 P.2d 1144,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

In re Parental Rights of PP, 648 P.2d 512,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 355

(Wyo. 1982); SLJ v. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re SJJ), 2005 WY 3, 104 P.3d 74,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(2005); DM v. State (In re L-MHB), 2017 WY 110, 401 P.3d 949,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2017); DM v. State (In re L-MHB), 2017 WY 110, 401 P.3d 949,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2017).